Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 60 O.S. 2021, Section 854, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 854. A. Membership of said owners association shall
consist of recorded owners of separately owned lots in the real
estate development. Membership is transferred upon legal transfer
of title to the separately owned lots. The owners association may
also enforce the covenant and restrictions of the real estate
development when specified by the covenants and restrictions.
B. Board members of an owners association, after the real
estate developer relinquishes control of the owners association,
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2588 Page 1

shal l consist of members of said owners association who are current
recorded owners of lots in the real estate development.
Furthermore, owners association board members shall physically
reside in the real estate development that is governed by said
owners association. For purposes of this act, a board member of
said owners association is deemed to “physically reside” in the real
estate development if the member maintains an address for personal
income tax purposes at a home or dwelling within the owners
association, and the member inhabits and maintains the home or
dwelling located at that address within the owners association as
the fixed, permanent, and principal home of the member for at least
ten (10) months, in the aggregate, during each calendar year in
which the member serves on the board. If at any time after the
member is elected to serve as a board member the member fails to
meet or no longer meets the requirements of physically residing in
the real estate development, that board member shall be deemed to
have automatically resigned his or her position as a board member.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.






ENGR. H. B. NO. 2588 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ______ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 2588 Page 3